Montana, session 2025, HB854.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Firearm suppressor tax credit -- purpose. (1) There is a credit against
the tax imposed by this chapter to offset the cost of one firearm suppressor tax stamp purchased by a taxpayer.
(2) The credit allowed under this section must be claimed in the tax year in which a firearm
suppressor tax stamp is purchased, and the maximum amount of the credit is equal to the lesser of the cost for
the firearm suppressor tax stamp or $50 for each taxpayer claiming the credit.
(3) The credit must be refunded if the taxpayer has a tax liability less than the credit claimed.
(4) Pursuant to 5-4-104, the legislature finds that the purpose of the tax credit provided for in this
section is to protect shooters from long-term hearing damage by offsetting costs imposed by the federal
government for a safety device.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 854

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 854.1
(5) As used in this section, "firearm suppressor tax stamp" means a stamp affixed to a federal
bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explosives form 1 or form 4 application to register a muffler or silencer.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 15, chapter 30, and the provisions of Title 15, chapter 30, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Applicability. [This act] applies to income tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Termination. [This act] terminates December 31, 2027.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 854